Maryland, session 2026, HB1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Behavioral health program” means a substance–related disorders program,
a mental health program, or an addictive disorders program, or a program that consists of
more than one of these programs.
7.5–404.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “INPATIENT FACILITY” MEANS A DWELLING, GROUP HOME,
TREATMENT RESIDENCE, OR HOUSING UNIT THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OPERATED,
OR OTHERWISE CONTROLLED BY A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM.
(3) “RESIDENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES AT AN
INPATIENT FACILITY, REGARDLESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S LENGTH OF STAY.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM
THAT OWNS, LEASES, OPERATES, OR CONTROLS AN INPATIENT FACILITY.
(C) (1) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL TAKE AFFIRMATIVE
AND REASONABLE STEPS TO DETERMINE WHETHER A RESIDENT IS REQUIRED TO
REGISTER UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE,
INCLUDING:
(I) ASKING THE RESIDENT WHETHER THE RESIDENT IS
REQUIRED BY LAW TO REGISTER AS A SEX OFFENDER; AND
(II) IF THE RESIDENT IS REQUIRED TO REGISTER, VERIFYING
WHETHER THE RESIDENT IS LISTED ON THE MARYLAND SEX OFFENDER REGISTRY.
(2) IF A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM DETERMINES THAT A
RESIDENT IS REQUIRED TO REGISTER, THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM SHALL
TAKE REASONABLE STEPS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 7 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE, INCLUDING:

HOUSE BILL 1293 3
(I) INFORMING THE RESIDENT OF THE RESIDENT’S LEGAL
OBLIGATIONS;
(II) ASSISTING WITH COORDINATION OR COMMUNICATING
WITH APPROPRIATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OR REGISTRY AUTHORITIES; AND
(III) DOCUMENTING COMPLIANCE EFFORTS.
(D) A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM MAY DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE
WITH THIS SECTION BY:
(1) MAINTAINING WRITTEN POLICIES REQUIRING INQUIRY AND
REGISTRY CHECKS; AND
(2) DOCUMENTING THE ACTIVITIES REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION
(C)(2) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BY
A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) ISSUE A WRITTEN NOTICE OF DEFICIENCY TO THE
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM; AND
(II) REQUIRE THE PROGRAM TO SUBMIT AND IMPLEMENT A
CORRECTIVE ACTION PLAN WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME SPECIFIED BY THE
DEPARTMENT;
(2) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION
BY A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM OR A FAILURE TO CORRECT A DEFICIENCY
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM IS SUBJECT TO A
CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 PER VIOLATION;
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE CONTINUED OR
ENHANCED CORRECTIVE ACTION; AND
(III) THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE ENHANCED MONITORING
OR REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
(3) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION OR A FAILURE TO CORRECT A DEFICIENCY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION:

HOUSE BILL 1293
(I) THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM IS SUBJECT TO A
CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 PER VIOLATION; AND
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY IMPOSE LICENSING OR
CERTIFICATION SANCTIONS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS ARTICLE,
INCLUDING PROBATION, SUSPENSION OR REVOCATION, OR DENIAL OF RENEWAL.
(F) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM TO REGISTER A
RESIDENT WITH THE MARYLAND SEX OFFENDER REGISTRY ON THE RESIDENT’S
BEHALF;
(2) REQUIRE A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM TO MAKE LEGAL
DETERMINATIONS BEYOND REASONABLE VERIFICATION OF A RESIDENT’S
REGISTRATION STATUS; OR
(3) MODIFY REGISTRATION OBLIGATIONS, CLASSIFICATIONS,
TIMELINES, OR PENALTIES UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 7 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
[7.5–404.] 7.5–405.
(a) An individual or organization may not operate a behavioral health program in
violation of this subtitle.
(b) An individual or organization that operates a behavioral health program
without the license required by this subtitle is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to a fine not exceeding $10,000 for each violation.
(c) The Department may file for and pursue an injunction to prevent an
individual or organization from operating a behavioral health program without the license
required by this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.